Utah statutes.
53A-6-403.    Office tie-in with the Criminal Investigations and Technical Services Division.

(1)  The office shall:

(a)  be an online terminal agency with the Department of Public Safety's Criminal Investigations and Technical Services Division under Section 53-10-108; and

(b)  provide relevant information concerning current or prospective employees or volunteers upon request to other school officials as provided in Section 53A-6-402.

(2)  The cost of the online service shall be borne by the entity making the inquiry, using funds available to the entity, which may include funds authorized under Section 53A-6-401.

